Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-301
Motor Vehicle Registration Act, how cited.

Sections 60-301 to 60-3,236 shall be known and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Registration Act.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 21;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 20;

Laws 2007, LB349, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB570, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB110, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB129, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 20;

Laws 2011, LB163, § 16;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 12;

Laws 2012, LB216, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 7;

Laws 2014, LB383, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB816, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB220, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB474, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB783, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB977, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB46, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 23;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 38;

Laws 2019, LB138, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB156, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB356, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 10;

Laws 2021, LB113, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB166, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB317, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB140, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 59;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 10;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 37.
July 18, 2026